Washington statutes.
RCW 39.46.150

Revenue bonds—Alternative method of issuance—Limitations.

(1) Any local government authorized to issue revenue bonds may issue revenue bonds under this section and RCW 39.46.160. If a local government chooses to issue revenue bonds under this section and RCW 39.46.160, the issue shall be subject to the limitations and restrictions of these sections. The authority to issue revenue bonds under this section and RCW 39.46.160 is supplementary and in addition to any authority otherwise existing. The maximum term of any revenue bonds shall be forty years unless another statute authorizing the local government to issue revenue bonds provides for a different maximum term, in which event the local government may issue revenue bonds only with terms not in excess of such different maximum term.

(2) The governing body of a local government issuing revenue bonds shall create a special fund or funds, or use an existing special fund or funds, exclusively from which, along with reserve funds which may be created by the governing body, the principal and interest on such revenue bonds shall be payable. These reserve funds include those authorized to be created by RCW 39.46.160.

Subject to the limitations contained in this section, the governing body of a local government may provide such covenants as it may deem necessary to secure the payment of the principal of and interest on revenue bonds, and premium on revenue bonds, if any. Such covenants may include, but are not limited to, depositing certain revenues into a special fund or funds as provided in subsection (3) of this section; establishing, maintaining, and collecting fees, rates, charges, tariffs, or rentals, on facilities and services, the income of which is pledged for the payment of such bonds; operating, maintaining, managing, accounting, and auditing the local government; appointing trustees, depositaries, and paying agents; and any and all matters of like or different character, which affect the security or protection of the revenue bonds.

(3) The governing body may obligate the local government to set aside and pay into a special fund or funds created under subsection (2) of this section a proportion or a fixed amount of the revenues from the following: (a) The public improvements, projects, or facilities that are financed by the revenue bonds; or (b) the public utility or system, or an addition or extension to the public utility or system, where the improvements, projects, or facilities financed by the revenue bonds are a portion of the public utility or system; or (c) all the revenues of the local government; or (d) any other money legally available for such purposes. As used in this subsection, the term "revenues" includes the operating revenues of a local government that result from fees, rates, charges, tariffs, or rentals imposed upon the use or availability or benefit from projects, facilities, or utilities owned or operated by the local government and from related services provided by the local government and other revenues legally available to be pledged to secure the revenue bonds.

The proportion or fixed amount of revenue so obligated shall be a lien and charge against these revenues, subject only to maintenance and operating expenses. The governing body shall have due regard for the cost of maintenance and operation of the public utility, system, improvement, project, facility, addition, or extension that generates revenues obligated to be placed into the special fund or funds from which the revenue bonds are payable, and shall not set aside into the special fund or funds a greater amount or proportion of the revenues that in its judgment will be available over and above such cost of maintenance and operation and the proportion or fixed amount, if any, of the revenue so previously pledged. Other revenues, including tax revenues, lawfully available for maintenance or operation of revenue generating facilities may be used for maintenance and operation purposes even though the facilities are acquired, constructed, expanded, replaced, or repaired with moneys arising from the sale of revenue bonds. However, the use of these other revenues for maintenance and operation purposes shall not be deemed to directly or indirectly guarantee the revenue bonds or create a general obligation. The obligation to maintain and impose fees, rates, charges, tariffs, or rentals at levels sufficient to finance maintenance and operations shall remain if the other revenues available for such purposes diminish or cease.

The governing body may also provide that revenue bonds payable out of the same source or sources of revenue may later be issued on a parity with any revenue bonds being issued and sold.

(4) A revenue bond issued by a local government shall not constitute an obligation of the state, either general or special, nor a general obligation of the local government issuing the bond, but is a special obligation of the local government issuing the bond, and the interest and principal on the bond shall only be payable from the special fund or funds established pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, the revenues lawfully pledged to the special fund or funds, and any lawfully created reserve funds. The owner of a revenue bond shall not have any claim for the payment thereof against the local government arising from the revenue bond except for payment from the special fund or funds, the revenues lawfully pledged to the special fund or funds, and any lawfully created reserve funds. The owner of a revenue bond issued by a local government shall not have any claim against the state arising from the revenue bond. Tax revenues shall not be used directly or indirectly to secure or guarantee the payment of the principal of or interest on revenue bonds.

[(5)] The substance of the limitations included in this subsection shall be plainly printed, written, engraved, or reproduced on: (a) Each revenue bond that is a physical instrument; (b) the official notice of sale; and (c) each official statement associated with the bonds.

(6) The authority to create a fund shall include the authority to create accounts within a fund.

(7) Local governments issuing revenue bonds, payable from revenues derived from projects, facilities, or utilities, shall covenant to maintain and keep these projects, facilities, or utilities in proper operating condition for their useful life.

[ 1986 c 168 s 1.]

NOTES:

Funds for reserve purposes may be included in issue amount: RCW 39.44.140.